task03/plurals.foma
define Vowels [a | e | i | o | u ];

read lexc english.lexc
define Lexicon;

# Исключения
define exceptions [g o o s e "^" s] -> [g e e s e];

# watch -> watches
define EInsertion [..] -> e || s | z | x | c h | s h | o _ "^" s ;

# elfs -> elves
define FEChange f -> v e || _ "^" s ,,
                f e -> v e || _ "^" s ;

# skys -> skies
define YChange y -> i e || \Vowels _ "^" s;

# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

regex Lexicon .o. exceptions .o. EInsertion .o. FEChange .o. YChange .o. Cleanup;
